District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.10

Termination of medical emergency.

The medical emergency affecting a leave recipient shall terminate when:

(1)

The leave recipient’s employment terminates; or

(2)

The leave recipient is no longer affected by the medical emergency.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1210
as added Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-155, § 2, 37 DCR 4159
1981 Ed., § 1-613.10.